Massachusetts, session 194th, S320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
Section 37. Training, assessment, and assignment of qualified school interpreters in
educational settings
(a) The following words, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the
following meanings:
“Department”, the department of elementary and secondary education;
of 4

“Limited English proficient (LEP) person”, an individual who has a limited ability to
read, write, speak or understand English because the person uses primarily a language other than
English. This includes LEP parents or guardians of minor children, regardless of the children’s
LEP status;
“Interpretation”, the immediate oral rendering of an utterance from a source language
into a target language;
“Interpreter”, a person who has demonstrated language proficiency in English and at least
one other language and is readily able to interpret spoken language from English to the target
language and from the target language to English, and who also has knowledge and
understanding of the pertinent subject matter to be translated, the role of the interpreter in school
settings, and ethics and confidentiality with respect to interpretation;
“Parent”, a natural, adoptive, or foster parent of a child, a guardian, or an individual
acting in the place of a natural or adoptive parent (including a grandparent, stepparent, or other
relative) with whom the child lives, or an individual who is legally responsible for the child’s
welfare;
“Specialized meeting”, a school district meeting requiring a high level of interpretation
skills including but not limited to discussion regarding: an Individualized Education Program
(IEP); a safety plan or behavioral intervention plan (BIP); matters regarding school discipline;
matters regarding special education due process; placement in an English Learner Education
(ELE) program; development of or changes to an Individual 504 plan; addressing bullying
complaints; or the use of physical restraint or seclusion of students;
of 4

“Standard meeting”, a parent conference, community meeting, or other school gathering
that does not have legal context.
“Tier 1 interpreter”, an interpreter whose language proficiency need not be formally
assessed;
“Tier 2 interpreter”, an interpreter who, after a formal assessment process to be
determined by the department, demonstrates an understanding of basic educational terminology
used in school settings, participates in ongoing professional development in interpreting, and
exhibits tier-2 competency pursuant to subsection 2 of this section and department regulations;
“Tier 3 interpreter”, an interpreter who, after a formal assessment process to be
determined by the department, understands specialized educational terminology used in school
settings, participates in ongoing professional development in interpreting, and exhibits tier-3
competency pursuant to subsection 2 of this section and department regulations.
(b) Consistent with the recommendations of the School Interpreters Task Force, as
authorized by section 81 of chapter 154 of the acts of 2018, the department shall: (1) develop and
administer a system for training, assessing, and determining qualifications of interpreters in
educational settings ensuring that tier 3 interpreters shall be used for all specialized meetings, tier
2 or 3 interpreters may be used for all standard meetings and tier 1 interpreters may be used
during spontaneous, unannounced meetings or communication scenarios that occur in schools
when a tier 3 or 2 interpreter is not available; (2) make available an educational course of
sufficient duration that includes coursework and field experience for tier 1, tier 2, and tier 3
interpreters, to support development of the key competencies and knowledge required of
interpreters in schools consistent with the courses developed by the department pursuant to
of 4

section 2A of chapter 102 of the acts of 2021; and (3) create a publicly accessible mechanism to
identify tier-3 interpreters for scheduled specialized meetings.
(c) The department shall adopt regulations necessary to administer a system for training,
assessing, and determining qualifications of interpreters in school settings to improve access for
LEP parents. Said regulations shall be consistent with the recommendations of the School
Interpreters Task Force, as authorized by section 81 of chapter 154 of the acts of 2018, and shall
include, but not be limited to:
(1) a process for assessing the language proficiency of interpreters seeking to interpret in
school settings, including required levels of competency necessary to obtain tier-2 and tier-3
interpreting status, with grandfathering allowed for school employees whose primary job
responsibility has been to serve as an interpreter for one or more years;
(2) required hours of supervised field experience for tier-3 interpreters; and
(3) procedures for implementation of the publicly accessible mechanism created pursuant
to subsection 1 of this section to identify and secure tier-3 interpreters for scheduled specialized
meetings.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage; provided, however, that the
department may administer a phased implementation of the provisions of subsection (b) of this
act to a diverse number of school districts, subject to appropriation, and provided further that
final implementation of all sections of this act, including by not limited to the requirement that
tier 3 interpreters shall be used for all specialized meetings, shall take effect statewide when
certified as appropriate by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education in a report
to the general court.
of 4